Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-206
International will; effect of certificate.

In the absence of evidence to the contrary, the certificate of the authorized person shall be conclusive of the formal validity of the instrument as a will under the Uniform Wills Recognition Act (1977). The absence or irregularity of a certificate shall not affect the formal validity of a will under the act.

Laws 2020, LB966, § 6.